Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.115

Amendment to bylaws—Approval of director required—Procedure.

(1) A credit union's field of membership bylaws may be amended by the board with approval of the director. Complete applications to amend a credit union's field of membership bylaws must be approved or denied by the director within sixty days of receipt.

(2) A credit union's other bylaws may be amended by the board.

(3) Any amendments to a credit union's bylaws must conform with RCW 31.12.065.

[ 2001 c 83 s 5; 1997 c 397 s 11. Prior: 1994 c 256 s 73; 1994 c 92 s 185; 1984 c 31 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.